Massachusetts, session 194th, H411.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as amended by section 3 of Chapter 29 of the Acts of
2021, is hereby amended by inserting after section 172O the following new section:-
“Section 172P. Notwithstanding section 172 or any other general or special law to the
contrary, the alcoholic beverages control commission may obtain all available criminal offender
record information for every applicant for an original license under section 12 or 15 of chapter
138. The commission may make such record information available to the local licensing
authority which is reviewing the application. The commission or local authority under this
section shall not disseminate the information for any purpose other than reviewing and approving
a license under said sections 12 and 15 of said chapter 138.”
of 1